Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF979.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 103G.223, is amended to read: 103G.223 CALCAREOUS FENS. (a) Calcareous fens, as identified by the commissioner by written order published in the State Register, may not be filled, drained, or otherwise degraded, wholly or partially, by any activity, unless the commissioner, under an approved management plan, decides some alteration is necessary or as provided in paragraph (b). Identifications made by the commissioner are not subject to the rulemaking provisions of chapter 14, and section 14.386 does not apply. (b) The commissioner may allow water appropriations that result in temporary reductions in groundwater resources on a seasonal basis under an approved calcareous fen management plan. new text begin (c) The commissioner may not deny a permit or prohibit an action based on its potential effect on a calcareous fen unless the commissioner first provides the applicant with a report on the calcareous fen potentially affected. A report under this paragraph must include a detailed description of the calcareous fen, an explanation of the ecological benefits provided by that specific calcareous fen, and a description of the adverse effects the commissioner believes would result if the permit or approval were granted. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin CALCAREOUS FEN DEFINITION; RULEMAKING.new text end new text begin The commissioner of natural resources must adopt rules defining a calcareous fen. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin REPORT ON ECOLOGICAL BENEFITS OF CALCAREOUS FENS.new text end new text begin By December 1, 2025, the commissioner of natural resources must submit a report on calcareous fens to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with primary jurisdiction over environment policy that includes: new text end new text begin (1) the commissioner's proposed definition of a calcareous fen and a detailed scientific rationale for how the proposed definition is preferable to alternative definitions; new text end new text begin (2) a detailed scientific explanation of the ecological benefits of calcareous fens and how those benefits compare to the benefits provided by other types of wetlands; and new text end new text begin (3) summary information about permit denials under Minnesota Statutes, section 103G.223, during the previous ten years. new text end